Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.020

Activities incompatible with public duties.

(1) No state officer or state employee may have an interest, financial or otherwise, direct or indirect, or engage in a business or transaction or professional activity, or incur an obligation of any nature, that is in conflict with the proper discharge of the state officer's or state employee's official duties.

(2) This section does not apply to activities conducted by legislative employees authorized under RCW 44.90.110.

[ 2024 c 333 s 20; 1996 c 213 s 2; 1994 c 154 s 102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 333: See note following RCW 44.90.025.